output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.aff
FLAG long
SFX MC Y 10
SFX MC 0 0/xPxE .
SFX MC i e/xPxBxO .
SFX MC i e/xPxE .
SFX MC i u/xPxE .
SFX MC i 0 .
SFX MC i ah/xPxE .
SFX MC i am/xPxE .
SFX MC i eju/xPxE .
SFX MC i ami/xPxE .
SFX MC i o/xPxE .

SFX MD Y 80
SFX MD ti l .
SFX MD ti la .
SFX MD ti lo .
SFX MD ti li .
SFX MD skyvati šču .
SFX MD skyvati ščem .
SFX MD skyvati ščeš .
SFX MD skyvati šče .
SFX MD skyvati ščemo .
SFX MD skyvati ščete .
SFX MD skyvati ščut .
SFX MD ti h .
SFX MD ti še .
SFX MD ti hmo .
SFX MD ti ste .
SFX MD ti hu .
SFX MD skyvati šči .
SFX MD skyvati ščimo .
SFX MD skyvati ščite .
SFX MD skyvati ščuči .
SFX MD skyvati ščučego .
SFX MD skyvati ščučemu .
SFX MD skyvati ščučim .
SFX MD skyvati ščučem .
SFX MD skyvati ščučih .
SFX MD skyvati ščučimi .
SFX MD skyvati ščuča .
SFX MD skyvati ščuču .
SFX MD skyvati ščučej .
SFX MD skyvati ščučeju .
SFX MD skyvati ščuče .
SFX MD skyvati ščemy .
SFX MD skyvati ščemogo .
SFX MD skyvati ščemomu .
SFX MD skyvati ščemym .
SFX MD skyvati ščemom .
SFX MD skyvati ščemo .
SFX MD skyvati ščema .
SFX MD skyvati ščemu .
SFX MD skyvati ščemoj .
SFX MD skyvati ščemoju .
SFX MD skyvati ščemi .
SFX MD skyvati ščeme .
SFX MD skyvati ščemyh .
SFX MD skyvati ščemym .
SFX MD skyvati ščemymi .
SFX MD ti vši .
SFX MD ti všego .
SFX MD ti všemu .
SFX MD ti všim .
SFX MD ti všem .
SFX MD ti vših .
SFX MD ti všimi .
SFX MD ti vša .
SFX MD ti všu .
SFX MD ti všej .
SFX MD ti všeju .
SFX MD ti vše .
SFX MD ti ny .
SFX MD ti nogo .
SFX MD ti nomu .
SFX MD ti nym .
SFX MD ti nom .
SFX MD ti ni .
SFX MD ti ne .
SFX MD ti nyh .
SFX MD ti nymi .
SFX MD ti na .
SFX MD ti nu .
SFX MD ti noj .
SFX MD ti noju .
SFX MD ti no .
SFX MD ti nje/xPxE .
SFX MD ti nja/xPxE .
SFX MD ti nju/xPxE .
SFX MD ti njem/xPxE .
SFX MD ti nij/xPxE .
SFX MD ti njam/xPxE .
SFX MD ti njami/xPxE .
SFX MD ti njah/xPxE .

SFX ME Y 28
SFX ME 0 0/xPxE .
SFX ME y o/xBxPxE .
SFX ME y a/xPxE .
SFX ME y ogo/xPxE .
SFX ME y u/xPxE .
SFX ME y oj/xPxE .
SFX ME y om/xPxE .
SFX ME y omu/xPxE .
SFX ME 0 m/xPxE .
SFX ME y oju/xPxE .
SFX ME y i/xPxE .
SFX ME y e/xPxE .
SFX ME 0 h/xPxE .
SFX ME 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX ME oky ši/zz .
SFX ME oky šego/zz .
SFX ME oky šemu/zz .
SFX ME oky šim/zz .
SFX ME oky šem/zz .
SFX ME oky še/zz .
SFX ME oky ša/zz .
SFX ME oky šu/zz .
SFX ME oky šej/zz .
SFX ME oky šeju/zz .
SFX ME oky ših/zz .
SFX ME oky šim/zz .
SFX ME oky šimi/zz .
SFX ME stoky šče/xPxE .

SFX MF Y 63
SFX MF ti l .
SFX MF ti la .
SFX MF ti lo .
SFX MF ti li .
SFX MF nuti u .
SFX MF nuti em .
SFX MF nuti eš .
SFX MF nuti e .
SFX MF nuti emo .
SFX MF nuti ete .
SFX MF nuti ut .
SFX MF ti h .
SFX MF ti še .
SFX MF ti hmo .
SFX MF ti ste .
SFX MF ti hu .
SFX MF nuti i .
SFX MF nuti imo .
SFX MF nuti ite .
SFX MF nuti uči .
SFX MF nuti učego .
SFX MF nuti učemu .
SFX MF nuti učim .
SFX MF nuti učem .
SFX MF nuti učih .
SFX MF nuti učimi .
SFX MF nuti uča .
SFX MF nuti uču .
SFX MF nuti učej .
SFX MF nuti učeju .
SFX MF nuti uče .
SFX MF nuti omy .
SFX MF nuti omogo .
SFX MF nuti omomu .
SFX MF nuti omym .
SFX MF nuti omom .
SFX MF nuti omo .
SFX MF nuti oma .
SFX MF nuti omu .
SFX MF nuti omoj .
SFX MF nuti omoju .
SFX MF nuti omi .
SFX MF nuti ome .
SFX MF nuti omyh .
SFX MF nuti omym .
SFX MF nuti omymi .
SFX MF nuti omo .
SFX MF ti vši .
SFX MF ti všego .
SFX MF ti všemu .
SFX MF ti všim .
SFX MF ti všem .
SFX MF ti vših .
SFX MF ti všimi .
SFX MF ti vša .
SFX MF ti všu .
SFX MF ti všej .
SFX MF ti všeju .
SFX MF ti vše .
SFX MF i y .
SFX MF i a .
SFX MF i o .
SFX MF i je .

SFX MG Y 10
SFX MG 0 0/xPxE .
SFX MG i o/xPxBxO .
SFX MG i e/xPxE .
SFX MG i u/xPxE .
SFX MG i 0 .
SFX MG i ah/xPxE .
SFX MG i am/xPxE .
SFX MG i eju/xPxE .
SFX MG i ami/xPxE .
SFX MG i o/xPxE .

SFX MH Y 80
SFX MH ti l .
SFX MH ti la .
SFX MH ti lo .
SFX MH ti li .
SFX MH skakati u .
SFX MH skakati em .
SFX MH skakati eš .
SFX MH skakati e .
SFX MH skakati emo .
SFX MH skakati ete .
SFX MH skakati ut .
SFX MH ti h .
SFX MH ti še .
SFX MH ti hmo .
SFX MH ti ste .
SFX MH ti hu .
SFX MH skakati j .
SFX MH skakati jmo .
SFX MH skakati jte .
SFX MH skakati juči .
SFX MH skakati jučego .
SFX MH skakati jučemu .
SFX MH skakati jučim .
SFX MH skakati jučem .
SFX MH skakati jučih .
SFX MH skakati jučimi .
SFX MH skakati juča .
SFX MH skakati juču .
SFX MH skakati jučej .
SFX MH skakati jučeju .
SFX MH skakati juče .
SFX MH skakati emy .
SFX MH skakati emogo .
SFX MH skakati emomu .
SFX MH skakati emym .
SFX MH skakati emom .
SFX MH skakati emo .
SFX MH skakati ema .
SFX MH skakati emu .
SFX MH skakati emoj .
SFX MH skakati emoju .
SFX MH skakati emi .
SFX MH skakati eme .
SFX MH skakati emyh .
SFX MH skakati emym .
SFX MH skakati emymi .
SFX MH ti vši .
SFX MH ti všego .
SFX MH ti všemu .
SFX MH ti všim .
SFX MH ti všem .
SFX MH ti vših .
SFX MH ti všimi .
SFX MH ti vša .
SFX MH ti všu .
SFX MH ti všej .
SFX MH ti všeju .
SFX MH ti vše .
SFX MH ti ny .
SFX MH ti nogo .
SFX MH ti nomu .
SFX MH ti nym .
SFX MH ti nom .
SFX MH ti ni .
SFX MH ti ne .
SFX MH ti nyh .
SFX MH ti nymi .
SFX MH ti na .
SFX MH ti nu .
SFX MH ti noj .
SFX MH ti noju .
SFX MH ti no .
SFX MH ti nje/xPxE .
SFX MH ti nja/xPxE .
SFX MH ti nju/xPxE .
SFX MH ti njem/xPxE .
SFX MH ti nij/xPxE .
SFX MH ti njam/xPxE .
SFX MH ti njami/xPxE .
SFX MH ti njah/xPxE .
